Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-619
Issuing a false financial statement for purposes of obtaining a financial transaction device; penalties.

(1) A person commits the offense of issuing a false financial statement for purposes of obtaining a financial transaction device if, upon filing an application for a financial transaction device with an issuer, such person (a) knowingly makes or causes to be made a statement or report which is false in some material respect and reasonably relied upon relative to his or her name, occupation, financial condition, assets, or liabilities, (b) willfully and materially overvalues any assets, or (c) willfully omits or materially undervalues any indebtedness with the intent of influencing the issuer to issue a financial transaction device.

(2) Any person issuing a false financial statement for the purposes of obtaining a financial transaction device, when such device is used in violation of this section to obtain money, property, or services, shall be guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.

(3) Any person issuing two or more false financial statements for purposes of obtaining two or more financial transaction devices, when such devices are used in violation of this section to obtain money, property, or services, shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1989, LB 372, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 899, § 1.